Tennessee, session 114, HB2625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, § 49-2-201, beginning with
the general election in August 2032, Cheatham County shall be divided into seven (7)
school districts of substantially equal population, which shall be established by resolution of
the county legislative body of Cheatham County. One (1) member of the Cheatham County
board of education shall be elected by the qualified votes in each school district.
SECTION 2. During the transition from six (6) school districts to seven (7) school
districts as provided for in this act, all incumbent board members shall remain on the board until
the expiration of their current terms. After the approval of this act, one (1) new member to the
board shall be elected in the general election of August 2032, and qualified according to law. In
order to maintain a board with staggered four-year terms, the new member of the board shall be
elected to a four-year term to fill the newly created office. Thereafter, board members shall be
elected to four-year terms as the term of each respective board member expires.
SECTION 3. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Cheatham County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 4. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 3.
HB2625
010211
- 1 -